Idaho, session 2026, H0561.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 67-2303A, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
67-2303A. FLAGS -- PROPER PROTOCOL. (1) As used in this section, "gov-
ernmental entity" means the state of Idaho or any county, municipality, spe-
cial district, or any other political subdivision or governmental instru-
mentality of or within the state other than a school, college, or university.
Property of a governmental entity includes land owned and maintained by the
governmental entity, including buildings, adjoining land, parks, roads, and
boulevards.
(2) A governmental entity shall not display a flag on its property other
than the following:
(a) The United States flag;
(b) The official flag of a governmental entity as defined in this sec-
tion;
(c) (b) Official flags of any state in the United States and the offi-
cial city or county flag as established prior to January 1, 2023;
(d) (c) Official flags of any of the military branches and units of the
United States;
(e) (d) The POW/MIA flag as provided for in section 67-2303, Idaho Code;
(f) (e) Official flags of recognized Indian tribes;
(g) (f) Official flags of countries other than the United States to com-
memorate special occasions or in recognition of historic international
and cross-border relations, including the Basque autonomous community
flag as recognized as an official flag by the Spanish government, but
excluding countries with which the United States is engaged in hostile
action; and
(h) Official flags of Idaho colleges, universities, and public
schools.
(g) The official flag of an Idaho college or university, if it has des-
ignated by official policy exactly one (1) official flag; and
(h) Flags, banners, or pennants displayed on government-owned flag-
poles or streetlights or on any government property along streets or
boulevards that are not political, religious, or ideological in nature.


(3) The provisions of subsection (2) of this section shall not apply to
any temporary parade or assembly on the property of a governmental entity.
(3) (4) The division of veterans services is hereby authorized to pro-
mulgate rules directing the proper protocol for the location and display of
flags flown on state property.
(5) A governmental entity that fails to comply with the provisions of
this section shall be subject to a civil penalty of two thousand dollars
($2,000) per flag for each day such flag is displayed.
(6) The attorney general shall have the duty to enforce this section
against a governmental entity. Before initiating a civil action against a
governmental entity, the attorney general shall advise the governmental en-
tity in writing of the violation and, if the governmental entity has not al-
ready been advised of a substantially similar violation, allow the govern-
mental entity ten (10) days to cure the violation. If the violation is cured
within ten (10) days, the governmental entity shall not be subject to civil
penalties for the violation. If the violation is not cured within ten (10)
days, or if the governmental entity is not entitled to an opportunity to cure
based on the commission of a substantially similar violation, the attorney
general shall have the authority to file a civil action in the district court
of the county in which the governmental entity is located to enjoin the gov-
ernmental entity from violating the provisions of this section and to re-
cover civil penalties accruing from the first day of violation. If the at-
torney general prevails in such action, the court shall award the attorney
general all attorney's fees incurred in bringing the action.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after its
passage and approval.